Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF5266.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [253B.30] POST CIVIL COMMITMENT RELIEF. new text end new text begin (a) An aggrieved party subject to a court order issued under this chapter on or after January 1, 2015, may file a petition at any time to vacate the order if the order was issued in error or relied on false or erroneous information. The court must grant the petition and vacate the order if the petitioner demonstrates by a preponderance of the evidence that the order was issued in error or relied on false or erroneous information. new text end new text begin (b) An aggrieved party may appeal an order issued under this section as in other civil cases by filing an appeal at any time after an order is issued under this section. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2026. new text end